utilities/dictionaries/fo_FO-Faroese.aff
FLAG num
#neyðsyn
SFX 833 N 6
SFX 833 j 0 .
SFX 833 j in .
SFX 833 j ina .
SFX 833 j ini .
SFX 833 0 ar .
SFX 833 0 arinnar .

#humanistiskur
SFX 834 N 9
SFX 834 0 istisk .
SFX 834 0 istiska .
SFX 834 0 istiskan .
SFX 834 0 istiskar .
SFX 834 0 istiskari .
SFX 834 0 istiskir .
SFX 834 0 istiskt .
SFX 834 0 istiskum .
SFX 834 0 istiskur .

#klænisperðil
SFX 835 N 2
SFX 835 0 il .
SFX 835 0 ilin .

#sjókyrt
SFX 836 N 2
SFX 836 r t .
SFX 836 0 um .

#smella
SFX 837 N 3
SFX 837 l t .
SFX 837 0 a .
SFX 837 0 ir .

#pufferma
SFX 838 N 17
SFX 838 a a .
SFX 838 a an .
SFX 838 a anna .
SFX 838 a u .
SFX 838 a um .
SFX 838 a una .
SFX 838 a uni .
SFX 838 a unnar .
SFX 838 a unum .
SFX 838 a ur .
SFX 838 a urnar .
SFX 838 0 a .
SFX 838 0 anna .
SFX 838 0 ar .
SFX 838 0 arnar .
SFX 838 0 um .
SFX 838 0 unum .

#tráður
SFX 839 N 12
SFX 839 0 a .
SFX 839 0 anna .
SFX 839 0 ar .
SFX 839 0 arins .
SFX 839 0 i .
SFX 839 0 in .
SFX 839 0 inum .
SFX 839 0 num .
SFX 839 0 um .
SFX 839 0 unum .
SFX 839 0 ur .
SFX 839 0 urin .

#Reykjanesryggurin
SFX 840 N 1
SFX 840 0 sins .

#skógvur
SFX 841 N 4
SFX 841 0 m .
SFX 841 0 num .
SFX 841 0 s .
SFX 841 0 sins .

#klænisperðil
SFX 842 N 1
SFX 842 0 lar .

#gita
SFX 843 N 8
SFX 843 t a .
SFX 843 t ið .
SFX 843 t ir .
SFX 843 t t .
SFX 843 t ti .
SFX 843 t tu .
SFX 843 t ur .
SFX 843 0 ur .

#jólaevangelium
SFX 844 N 6
SFX 844 0 i .
SFX 844 0 ið .
SFX 844 0 inum .
SFX 844 0 is .
SFX 844 0 isins .
SFX 844 0 um .

#rangatoft
SFX 845 N 10
SFX 845 0 a .
SFX 845 0 anna .
SFX 845 0 ar .
SFX 845 0 arinnar .
SFX 845 0 in .
SFX 845 0 ini .
SFX 845 0 ir .
SFX 845 0 irnar .
SFX 845 0 um .
SFX 845 0 unum .

#Reykjanesryggurin
SFX 846 N 4
SFX 846 j in .
SFX 846 j inum .
SFX 846 j urin .
SFX 846 0 arins .

#rummalareiggj
SFX 847 N 7
SFX 847 j i .
SFX 847 j ið .
SFX 847 j ini .
SFX 847 0 a .
SFX 847 0 anna .
SFX 847 0 um .
SFX 847 0 unum .

#Norðhavið
SFX 848 N 4
SFX 848 0 ið .
SFX 848 0 inum .
SFX 848 0 num .
SFX 848 0 sins .

#hugsjónarligur
SFX 849 N 7
SFX 849 0 lig .
SFX 849 0 ligan .
SFX 849 0 ligar .
SFX 849 0 ligari .
SFX 849 0 ligir .
SFX 849 0 ligt .
SFX 849 0 ligur .

#vígmegi
SFX 850 N 5
SFX 850 0 i .
SFX 850 0 ið .
SFX 850 0 is .
SFX 850 0 isins .
SFX 850 0 num .

#konservativur
SFX 851 N 9
SFX 851 0 iv .
SFX 851 0 iva .
SFX 851 0 ivan .
SFX 851 0 ivar .
SFX 851 0 ivari .
SFX 851 0 ivir .
SFX 851 0 ivt .
SFX 851 0 ivum .
SFX 851 0 ivur .

#Kirkjubøur
SFX 852 N 2
SFX 852 0 ar .
SFX 852 0 ur .

#skógvur
SFX 853 N 10
SFX 853 0 a .
SFX 853 0 anna .
SFX 853 0 ar .
SFX 853 0 arnar .
SFX 853 0 arnir .
SFX 853 0 i .
SFX 853 0 in .
SFX 853 0 inum .
SFX 853 0 ur .
SFX 853 0 urin .

#ideologi
SFX 854 N 12
SFX 854 0 logi .
SFX 854 0 logia .
SFX 854 0 logianna .
SFX 854 0 logiar .
SFX 854 0 logiarinnar .
SFX 854 0 logiin .
SFX 854 0 logiina .
SFX 854 0 logiini .
SFX 854 0 logiir .
SFX 854 0 logiirnar .
SFX 854 0 logium .
SFX 854 0 logiunum .

#kondittarí
SFX 855 N 11
SFX 855 0 arí .
SFX 855 0 aría .
SFX 855 0 aríanna .
SFX 855 0 aríi .
SFX 855 0 aríið .
SFX 855 0 aríini .
SFX 855 0 arínum .
SFX 855 0 arís .
SFX 855 0 arísins .
SFX 855 0 aríum .
SFX 855 0 aríunum .

#illsinnisríð
SFX 856 N 10
SFX 856 0 ið .
SFX 856 0 ins .
SFX 856 0 na .
SFX 856 0 nanna .
SFX 856 0 num .
SFX 856 0 u .
SFX 856 0 um .
SFX 856 0 uni .
SFX 856 0 unum .
SFX 856 0 ur .

#avbronglan
SFX 857 N 12
SFX 857 0 an .
SFX 857 0 ana .
SFX 857 0 ananna .
SFX 857 0 anar .
SFX 857 0 anarinnar .
SFX 857 0 anin .
SFX 857 0 anina .
SFX 857 0 anini .
SFX 857 0 anir .
SFX 857 0 anirnar .
SFX 857 0 anum .
SFX 857 0 anunum .

#reyðiviður
SFX 858 N 5
SFX 858 0 ar .
SFX 858 0 arins .
SFX 858 0 i .
SFX 858 0 in .
SFX 858 0 inum .

#aveldast
SFX 859 N 5
SFX 859 d dist .
SFX 859 d dust .
SFX 859 0 ast .
SFX 859 0 ist .
SFX 859 0 st .

#illasjúka
SFX 860 N 4
SFX 860 u a .
SFX 860 u anna .
SFX 860 u u .
SFX 860 0 nnar .

#verður
SFX 861 N 13
SFX 861 0 a .
SFX 861 0 anna .
SFX 861 0 ar .
SFX 861 0 arins .
SFX 861 0 i .
SFX 861 0 in .
SFX 861 0 inum .
SFX 861 0 irnar .
SFX 861 0 irnir .
SFX 861 0 um .
SFX 861 0 unum .
SFX 861 0 ur .
SFX 861 0 urin .

#kittil
SFX 862 N 13
SFX 862 t la .
SFX 862 t lanna .
SFX 862 t lar .
SFX 862 t larnar .
SFX 862 t larnir .
SFX 862 t li .
SFX 862 t linum .
SFX 862 t lum .
SFX 862 t lunum .
SFX 862 0 il .
SFX 862 0 ilin .
SFX 862 0 ils .
SFX 862 0 ilsins .

#aningarstrá
SFX 863 N 5
SFX 863 0 a .
SFX 863 0 anna .
SFX 863 0 nni .
SFX 863 0 um .
SFX 863 0 unum .

#drekka
SFX 864 N 11
SFX 864 k na .
SFX 864 k nanna .
SFX 864 0 a .
SFX 864 0 að .
SFX 864 0 ans .
SFX 864 0 anum .
SFX 864 0 u .
SFX 864 0 um .
SFX 864 0 uni .
SFX 864 0 unum .
SFX 864 0 ur .

#nummar
SFX 865 N 5
SFX 865 r rinum .
SFX 865 r rum .
SFX 865 r runum .
SFX 865 0 a .
SFX 865 0 anna .

#hálda
SFX 866 N 5
SFX 866 d t .
SFX 866 0 a .
SFX 866 0 ið .
SFX 866 0 u .
SFX 866 0 ur .

#býggjur
SFX 867 N 7
SFX 867 j i .
SFX 867 j in .
SFX 867 j inum .
SFX 867 0 ar .
SFX 867 0 arins .
SFX 867 0 ur .
SFX 867 0 urin .

#erma
SFX 868 N 14
SFX 868 a an .
SFX 868 a anna .
SFX 868 a u .
SFX 868 a um .
SFX 868 a una .
SFX 868 a uni .
SFX 868 a unnar .
SFX 868 a unum .
SFX 868 a ur .
SFX 868 a urnar .
SFX 868 0 a .
SFX 868 0 anna .
SFX 868 0 ar .
SFX 868 0 arnar .

#sterril
SFX 869 N 13
SFX 869 r la .
SFX 869 r lanna .
SFX 869 r lar .
SFX 869 r larnar .
SFX 869 r larnir .
SFX 869 r li .
SFX 869 r linum .
SFX 869 r lum .
SFX 869 r lunum .
SFX 869 0 il .
SFX 869 0 ilin .
SFX 869 0 ils .
SFX 869 0 ilsins .

#unna
SFX 870 N 9
SFX 870 n t .
SFX 870 n ti .
SFX 870 n tu .
SFX 870 0 a .
SFX 870 0 að .
SFX 870 0 aði .
SFX 870 0 aðu .
SFX 870 0 ar .
SFX 870 0 ir .

#stóripottur
SFX 871 N 5
SFX 871 t s .
SFX 871 t sins .
SFX 871 0 i .
SFX 871 0 in .
SFX 871 0 inum .

#barnagaman
SFX 872 N 11
SFX 872 0 an .
SFX 872 0 anið .
SFX 872 0 anini .
SFX 872 0 ans .
SFX 872 0 ansins .
SFX 872 0 na .
SFX 872 0 nanna .
SFX 872 0 ni .
SFX 872 0 ninum .
SFX 872 0 num .
SFX 872 0 nunum .

#syfilis
SFX 873 N 2
SFX 873 0 ins .
SFX 873 0 inum .

#atborið
SFX 874 N 3
SFX 874 0 ið .
SFX 874 0 in .
SFX 874 0 num .

#toyggjur
SFX 875 N 5
SFX 875 j i .
SFX 875 j in .
SFX 875 j inum .
SFX 875 0 ur .
SFX 875 0 urin .

#lissa
SFX 876 N 6
SFX 876 t a .
SFX 876 t að .
SFX 876 t aði .
SFX 876 t aðu .
SFX 876 t ar .
SFX 876 t ir .

#jørðildi
SFX 877 N 5
SFX 877 0 ildi .
SFX 877 0 ildið .
SFX 877 0 ildinum .
SFX 877 0 ildis .
SFX 877 0 ildisins .

#komma
SFX 878 N 11
SFX 878 m na .
SFX 878 m nanna .
SFX 878 0 a .
SFX 878 0 að .
SFX 878 0 ans .
SFX 878 0 anum .
SFX 878 0 u .
SFX 878 0 um .
SFX 878 0 uni .
SFX 878 0 unum .
SFX 878 0 ur .

#klógv
SFX 879 N 8
SFX 879 0 ar .
SFX 879 0 arinnar .
SFX 879 0 ir .
SFX 879 0 irnar .
SFX 879 0 m .
SFX 879 0 nna .
SFX 879 0 nni .
SFX 879 0 num .

#devilskur
SFX 880 N 9
SFX 880 0 ilsk .
SFX 880 0 ilska .
SFX 880 0 ilskan .
SFX 880 0 ilskar .
SFX 880 0 ilskari .
SFX 880 0 ilskir .
SFX 880 0 ilskt .
SFX 880 0 ilskum .
SFX 880 0 ilskur .

#sperra
SFX 881 N 9
SFX 881 r di .
SFX 881 r du .
SFX 881 r t .
SFX 881 0 a .
SFX 881 0 að .
SFX 881 0 aði .
SFX 881 0 aðu .
SFX 881 0 ar .
SFX 881 0 ir .

#berserkur
SFX 882 N 17
SFX 882 j 0 .
SFX 882 j i .
SFX 882 j in .
SFX 882 j inum .
SFX 882 j ir .
SFX 882 j irnar .
SFX 882 j irnir .
SFX 882 j s .
SFX 882 j sins .
SFX 882 j ur .
SFX 882 j urin .
SFX 882 0 a .
SFX 882 0 anna .
SFX 882 0 ar .
SFX 882 0 arins .
SFX 882 0 um .
SFX 882 0 unum .

#mammutur
SFX 883 N 15
SFX 883 0 ut .
SFX 883 0 uta .
SFX 883 0 utanna .
SFX 883 0 utar .
SFX 883 0 utarnar .
SFX 883 0 utarnir .
SFX 883 0 uti .
SFX 883 0 utin .
SFX 883 0 utinum .
SFX 883 0 uts .
SFX 883 0 utsins .
SFX 883 0 utum .
SFX 883 0 utunum .
SFX 883 0 utur .
SFX 883 0 uturin .

#sjóseta
SFX 884 N 10
SFX 884 t 0 .
SFX 884 t a .
SFX 884 t ið .
SFX 884 t ir .
SFX 884 t t .
SFX 884 t ti .
SFX 884 t tu .
SFX 884 t u .
SFX 884 t ur .
SFX 884 0 ur .

#bakali
SFX 885 N 5
SFX 885 0 ali .
SFX 885 0 alið .
SFX 885 0 alinum .
SFX 885 0 alis .
SFX 885 0 alisins .
